District of Columbia statutes.
26-1004

License qualifications.

(a)

Each licensee under this chapter shall at all times have a net worth of not less than $100,000, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Licensees engaging in money transmission at more than one location or through authorized delegates shall have an additional net worth of $50,000 per location or authorized delegate located in the District of Columbia, as applicable. The maximum net worth required for all locations shall not exceed $500,000.

(b)

Every corporate applicant, at the time of filing of an application for a license under this chapter and at all times after a license is issued, shall be in good standing in the state of its incorporation. All non-corporate applicants shall, at the time of the filing of an application for a license under this chapter and at all times after a license is issued, be registered or qualified to do business in the District of Columbia.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 5, 47 DCR 3431